Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 101. Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Component Construction Material Costs Rebate Program

§§ 57-101-1 through 57-101-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2013, ch. 447, § 5, effective from and after July 1, 2013.

§57-101-1. [Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.)]

§57-101-3. [Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.)]

§57-101-5. [Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.)]